Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,146
Uncovered expenditures; reports.

The director may require a health maintenance organization to file annual or quarterly, or more frequent, reports of uncovered expenditures and liability for uncovered expenditures. The director may require that the reports include an audit opinion.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 55.